Wisconsin, session 2025, SB927.
do enact as follows:SB927,13Section 1. 628.34 (16) of the statutes is created to read:SB927,1,44628.34 (16) Pet insurance. (a) In this subsection:SB927,1,551. “Pet insurance” has the meaning in s. 632.105 (1) (e).SB927,1,662. “Pet wellness program” has the meaning in s. 632.105 (1) (f).SB927,1,77(b) No person may do any of the following:SB927,1,881. Market a pet wellness program as pet insurance.SB927,2,212. Market a pet wellness program during the sale, solicitation, or negotiation 2of pet insurance.SB927,2,43(c) If a pet wellness program is sold by an insurer or intermediary that sells 4pet insurance policies, all of the following apply:SB927,2,651. The purchase of the pet wellness program may not be a requirement for the 6purchase of a pet insurance policy.SB927,2,872. The costs of the pet wellness program must be separate and identifiable 8from any pet insurance policy sold by the insurer or intermediary.SB927,2,1093. The terms and conditions for the pet wellness program must be separate 10from any pet insurance policy sold by the insurer or intermediary.SB927,2,13114. The products or coverage available through the pet wellness program may 12not duplicate products or coverage available through a pet insurance policy sold by 13the insurer or intermediary.SB927,2,14145. The advertising of the pet wellness program may not be misleading.SB927,2,16156. The insurer or intermediary must clearly disclose all of the following, 16printed in 12-point boldface type:SB927,2,1717a. A statement that pet wellness programs are not insurance.SB927,2,1918b. The mailing address and customer service telephone number of the insurer 19or intermediary.SB927,2,2120c. The mailing address, telephone number, and website address of the office of 21the commissioner of insurance.SB927,222Section 2. 628.349 of the statutes is created to read:SB927,2,2323628.349 Pet insurance. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB927,2,2424(a) “Chronic condition” has the meaning in s. 632.105 (1) (a).SB927,3,11(b) “Congenital anomaly or disorder” has the meaning in s. 632.105 (1) (b).SB927,3,22(c) “Hereditary disorder” has the meaning in s. 632.105 (1) (c). SB927,3,33(d) “Pet insurance” has the meaning in s. 632.105 (1) (e).SB927,3,44(e) “Pet wellness program” has the meaning in s. 632.105 (1) (f).SB927,3,55(f) “Preexisting condition” has the meaning in s. 632.105 (1) (g).SB927,3,66(g) “Waiting period” has the meaning in s. 632.105 (1) (j).SB927,3,97(2) Required training. (a) Except as provided in par. (b), no person may sell, 8solicit, or negotiate a pet insurance product unless the person is a licensed 9intermediary and has completed training that covers all of the following topics:SB927,3,10101. Preexisting conditions and waiting periods under a pet insurance policy.SB927,3,11112. The differences between pet insurance and pet wellness programs.SB927,3,13123. Hereditary disorders, congenital anomalies or disorders, and chronic 13conditions and how a pet insurance policy interacts with them.SB927,3,14144. Rating, underwriting, renewal, and other insurance administrative topics.SB927,3,1615(b) The commissioner may determine that the satisfaction of a substantially 16similar training requirement of another state satisfies the requirement of par. (a).SB927,3,1817(3) Insurer verification. Insurers providing pet insurance shall do all of 18the following:SB927,3,2119(a) Obtain from each intermediary selling pet insurance policies on the 20insurer’s behalf verification that the intermediary is in compliance with the 21training requirement under sub. (2).SB927,3,2322(b) Maintain records related to the verifications obtained under par. (a) and 23make the records available to the commissioner upon request.   SB927,324Section 3. 632.105 of the statutes is created to read:SB927,4,11632.105 Pet insurance. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB927,4,32(a) “Chronic condition” means a condition that can be treated or managed, but 3not cured.SB927,4,64(b) “Congenital anomaly or disorder” means a condition that is present from 5birth, whether inherited or caused by the environment, and that may cause or 6contribute to illness or disease.SB927,4,87(c) “Hereditary disorder” means an abnormality that is genetically 8transmitted from parent to offspring and may cause illness or disease.SB927,4,139(d) “Orthopedic condition” means a condition affecting bones, skeletal muscle, 10cartilage, tendons, ligaments, or joints, or any combination thereof, including elbow 11or hip dysplasia, intervertebral disc degeneration, patellar luxation, and ruptured 12cranial cruciate ligaments. “Orthopedic condition” does not include cancer or a 13metabolic, hemopoietic, or autoimmune disease.SB927,4,1514(e) “Pet insurance” means a property insurance policy issued in this state that 15provides coverage for accidents and illnesses of a pet.SB927,4,2016(f) “Pet wellness program” means a subscription or reimbursement program 17that provides goods and services to promote the general health, safety, and well-18being of a pet and that is separate from a pet insurance policy, is not included on a 19pet insurance policy form, and does not shift the risk of loss in exchange for 20premiums.SB927,4,2321(g) “Preexisting condition” means a condition of a pet for which any of the 22following is true prior to the effective date of, or during any waiting period required 23under, a pet insurance policy:SB927,4,24241. A veterinarian provided medical advice.SB927,5,112. The pet received treatment. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb927 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb927 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB927 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB927 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB927: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting